Texas, session 892, HB199.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Section 45.003(a), Education Code, is amended to read as follows: (a)  Bonds described by Section 45.001 may not be issued and taxes described by Section 45.001 or 45.002 may not be levied unless authorized by a majority of the qualified voters of the district, voting at an election held for that purpose, at the expense of the district, in accordance with the Election Code, except as provided by this subchapter [section].  Each election must be called by resolution or order of the governing board or commissioners court. The resolution or order must state the date of the election, the proposition or propositions to be submitted and voted on, the polling place or places, and any other matters considered necessary or advisable by the governing board or commissioners court. SECTION 2.  Subchapter A, Chapter 45, Education Code, is amended by adding Section 45.0034 to read as follows: Sec. 45.0034.  DATE OF ELECTION. An election held by a school district to authorize the issuance of bonds under Section 45.003 shall be held on the same date as a general primary election, a general election for state and county officers, or a general election held in the boundaries of the school district on the May uniform election date. SECTION 3.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.